Missouri, session 2026, SB1695.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 537.035, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 537.035,
to read as follows:
537.035. 1. As used in this section, unless the
context clearly indicates otherwise, the following words and
terms shall have the meanings indicated:
(1) "Health care professional", a physician or surgeon
licensed under the provisions of chapter 334, or a dentist
licensed under the provisions of chapter 332, or a
podiatrist licensed under the provisions of chapter 330, or
an optometrist licensed under the provisions of chapter 336,
or a pharmacist licensed under the provisions of chapter
338, or a chiropractor licensed under the provisions of
chapter 331, or a psychologist licensed under the provisions
of chapter 337, or a nurse licensed under the provisions of
chapter 335, or a social worker licensed under the
provisions of chapter 337, or a professional counselor
licensed under the provisions of chapter 337, or a mental
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1695 2
health professional as defined in section 632.005, while
acting within their scope of practice;
(2) "Peer review committee", a committee of health
care professionals with the responsibility to evaluate,
maintain, or monitor the quality and utilization of health
care services or to exercise any combination of such
responsibilities.
2. A peer review committee may be constituted as
follows:
(1) Comprised of, and appointed by, a state, county or
local society of health care professionals;
(2) Comprised of, and appointed by, the partners,
shareholders, or employed health care professionals of a
partnership or professional corporation of health care
professionals, or employed health care professionals of a
university or an entity affiliated with a university
operating under chapter 172, 174, 352, or 355;
(3) Appointed by the board of trustees, chief
executive officer, or the organized medical staff of a
licensed hospital, or other health facility operating under
constitutional or statutory authority, including long-term
care facilities licensed under chapter 198, or an
administrative entity of the department of mental health
recognized pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (3) of
subsection 1 of section 630.407;
(4) Any other organization formed pursuant to state or
federal law authorized to exercise the responsibilities of a
peer review committee and acting within the scope of such
authorization;
(5) Appointed by the board of directors, chief
executive officer or the medical director of the licensed
health maintenance organization.

SB 1695 3
3. Each member of a peer review committee and each
person, hospital governing board, health maintenance
organization board of directors, and chief executive officer
of a licensed hospital or other hospital operating under
constitutional or statutory authority, chief executive
officer or medical director of a licensed health maintenance
organization who testifies before, or provides information
to, acts upon the recommendation of, or otherwise
participates in the operation of, such a committee shall be
immune from civil liability for such acts so long as the
acts are performed in good faith, without malice and are
reasonably related to the scope of inquiry of the peer
review committee.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
[interviews,] memoranda, [proceedings,] findings,
deliberations, and reports[, and minutes] of peer review
committees[, or the existence of the same,] concerning the
health care provided any individual identifiable patient are
privileged and [shall] may not be [subject to discovery,
subpoena, or other means of legal compulsion for their
release to any person or entity or be] admissible into
evidence in any judicial or administrative action for
failure to provide appropriate care. Except as otherwise
provided in this section, no person who was in attendance at
any peer review committee proceeding shall be permitted or
required [to disclose any information acquired in connection
with or in the course of such proceeding, or] to disclose
any opinion, recommendation, or evaluation of the committee
or board, or any member thereof[; provided, however, that].
Such information otherwise discoverable or admissible [from
original sources] is not to be construed as immune from
discovery or use in any proceeding merely because it was

SB 1695 4
presented, discovered, or considered during proceedings
before a peer review committee nor is a member, employee, or
agent of such committee, or other person appearing before
it, to be prevented from testifying as to matters [within
his personal knowledge] in accordance with the rules of
evidence and in accordance with the other provisions of this
section, but such witness cannot be questioned about
[testimony or other proceedings before any health care
review committee or board or about] opinions formed solely
as a result of such committee hearings. [The disclosure of
any interview, memoranda, proceedings, findings,
deliberations, reports, or minutes to any person or entity,
including but not limited to governmental agencies,
professional accrediting agencies, or other health care
providers, whether proper or improper, shall not waive or
have any effect upon its confidentiality,
nondiscoverability, or nonadmissibility.]
5. The provisions of subsection 4 of this section
limiting [discovery and] admissibility of testimony as well
as the [proceedings,] findings[,] and records[, and minutes]
100 of peer review committees do not apply in any judicial or
101 administrative action brought by a peer review committee or
102 the legal entity which formed or within which such committee
103 operates to deny, restrict, or revoke the hospital staff
104 privileges or license to practice of a physician or other
105 health care providers; or when a member, employee, or agent
106 of the peer review committee or the legal entity which
107 formed such committee or within which such committee
108 operates is sued for actions taken by such committee which
109 operate to deny, restrict or revoke the hospital staff
110 privileges or license to practice of a physician or other
111 health care provider.

SB 1695 5
112 6. Nothing in this section shall limit authority
113 otherwise provided by law of a health care licensing board
114 of the state of Missouri to obtain information by subpoena
115 or other authorized process from peer review committees or
116 to require disclosure of otherwise confidential information
117 relating to matters and investigations within the
118 jurisdiction of such health care licensing boards.
✓